Illinois, session 104th, SB668.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Farm to Food Bank Program Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 44/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Farm to Food Bank Program Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-412, eff. 8-3-23.)